Alaska statutes. Title 35. Public Buildings, Works, and Improvements.
Article 4. Public Facility Procurement Policy.

Sec. 35.10.160.
Findings and purpose.

The legislature finds that since the needs of the state for physical facilities of all kinds are diverse, the planning, design, and construction of public facilities should be executed in accordance with facility procurement policies developed by the department and reviewed annually by the legislature.

History.

(§ 1 ch 216 SLA 1975)

Sec. 35.10.170.
Duties of department.

In addition to other duties prescribed by statute, the department shall

develop facility procurement policies for the planning, design, construction, maintenance, and operation of public facilities of the state;

develop and maintain an inventory of physical facilities currently owned or occupied by the state;

make projections of future public facility needs of the state, analyze facilities needed, and establish methodology for program planning and facilities project planning, design, and construction, based upon

a justification of the level of service anticipated by the program agency, utilizing population projections and estimates approved by the governor;

consideration of the geographical area to be served by the facility and relevant data concerning the agency’s existing public facilities in that area;

the date by which the services are to be provided;

alternative program methods for providing the services; and

pertinent data requested by the department in accordance with procedures developed under AS

35.10.180

;

engage in experimental projects as necessary relating to any available or future method of facility procurement, design, or construction and any method of improving existing design, planning, and construction techniques;

develop life cycle costs of public facilities of the state;

develop life cycle costing methodologies for the following special purposes:

budget forecasting to support facility program planning and analysis;

systematic cost estimating to forecast planning, design, and construction;

budget forecasting to support development of annual maintenance and operating strategies and life cycle cost plans;

alternative methods of space acquisition and space equalization which will maximize the effectiveness of public funds;

apply for and accept, on behalf of the state, grants from the federal government or an agency of it or from another state foundation, corporation, association, or individual for any of the functions or purposes of the department and may expend any of the money received under this section for any of the functions or purposes.

History.

(§ 1 ch 216 SLA 1975; am § 1 ch 168 SLA 1978)

Sec. 35.10.180.
Physical facility procurement and planning policies.

The department shall develop and keep current by periodic revision physical facility procurement and planning policies for public buildings and other state facilities and shall develop regulations and guidelines for the implementation of these policies.

In developing and revising these policies the department shall seek public review and evaluation by any reasonable means and shall

consult and cooperate with officials of the federal government, local governments, other political subdivisions of the state, and other interested persons regarding physical facility procurement planning;

request and receive from an agency or other unit of the state government the assistance and data needed to carry out the requirements of this section.

The commissioner shall submit copies of proposed policies and plans annually, within 10 days after the legislature convenes, to the legislature. The legislature may approve, reject, or modify the policies and plans by concurrent resolution. If the legislature fails to act during the legislative session, the policies and plans are approved.

History.

(§ 1 ch 216 SLA 1975; am § 47 ch 35 SLA 2003)

Sec. 35.10.190.
Coordination by department.

The department shall coordinate the procurement of physical facilities for the state to insure the greatest cost savings of planning, design, and contractual techniques.

When the state or an agency of the state determines that a public facility is to be constructed or renovated, it shall, unless exempted by regulations of the department, submit to the department an application for a certificate that the proposed facility complies with adopted facility procurement policies. The department may reject the application but if it does so it shall state in writing the reasons for the rejection. If a written statement that the application is rejected does not issue within 30 days after receipt of the application by the department, unless the department and the applicant have agreed upon an extension of time for consideration, the certificate of compliance is not required. Except as provided otherwise by regulation or by this section, a public facility of the state may not be constructed or renovated by the state unless a certificate that the facility complies with adopted facility procurement policies has been issued.

History.

(§ 1 ch 216 SLA 1975)

Sec. 35.10.195.
Conformance with AS 36.30.

The contractual techniques for the procurement of labor, materials, and contractual services under the policies developed under this chapter must conform to the requirements of AS 36.30 (State Procurement Code).

History.

(§ 33 ch 106 SLA 1986)

Sec. 35.10.200.
Definitions.

In AS

35.10.160

—

35.10.200

,

“life cycle costs” means analytic techniques which provide data to describe the first cost of procurement of public facilities and the maintenance cost, operation cost, and occupancy cost of the facilities;

“policies” includes but is not limited to budget accounting and cost planning techniques, facility design techniques, and contractual techniques for the procurement of labor, materials, and contractual services.

History.

(§ 1 ch 216 SLA 1975; am § 35 ch 168 SLA 1978)